en: Media access: Digital subscription; Online; Print; Print & online; Other
it: Accesso ai contenuti multimediali: Abbonamento digitale; Online; Stampa; Stampa e online; Altro
nb: Mediatilgang: Digitalt abonnement; På nett; Utskrift; Utskrift og online; Annet
pt-PT: Acesso multimédia: Subscrição digital; Online; Impressão; Imprimir e online; Outro
fr: Accès aux médias: Abonnement numérique; En ligne; Imprimer; Imprimer et en ligne; Autre
vi: Truy cập phương tiện truyền thông: Gói đăng ký kỹ thuật số; Trực tuyến; In; In và trực tuyến; Khác
fi: Mediapääsy: Digitilaus; Verkossa; Tuloste; Tuloste ja verkossa; Muu
zh-CN: 媒体访问: 数字订阅; 线上; 打印; 打印和线上; 其他
cs: Přístup k médiím: Digitální předplatné; Online; Tisk; Tisk a online; Jiné
nl: Mediatoegang: Digitaal abonnement; Online; Afdrukken; Afdrukken en online; Andere
pt-BR: Acesso à mídia: Assinatura digital; Online; Imprimir; Imprimir e online; Outro
hr-HR: Pristup medijskom sadržaju: Digitalna pretplata; Na mreži; Tisak; Tisak i na mreži; Ostalo
tr: Medya erişimi: Dijital abonelik; Çevrimiçi; Yazdır; Yazdır ve çevrimiçi; Diğer
sk-SK: Prístup k médiám: Digitálne predplatné; Online; Tlačiť; Tlač a online; Iné
ro-RO: Acces conținut media: Abonament digital; Online; Imprimare; Imprimare și online; Altele
sv: Medieåtkomst: Digitalt abonnemang; På nätet; Skriva ut; Skriva ut & på nätet; Övrigt
th: การเข้าถึงสื่อ: การสมัครใช้งานแบบดิจิทัล; ออนไลน์; การพิมพ์; สิ่งพิมพ์และออนไลน์; อื่นๆ
pl: Dostęp do mediów: Subskrypcja cyfrowa; Online; Drukuj; Druk i online; Inne
sl-SI: Dostop do medijev: Digitalna naročnina; Na spletu; Tiskano; Tiskan in na spletu; Drugo
de: Medienzugriff: Digitales Abonnement; Online; Drucken; Ausdruck & online; Sonstiges
el: Πρόσβαση στα μέσα: Ψηφιακή συνδρομή; Διαδικτυακά; Έντυπα; Έντυπα και διαδικτυακά; Άλλο
hu: Média-hozzáférés: Digitális előfizetés; Online; Nyomtatás; Nyomtatás és online; Egyéb
lt-LT: Prieiga prie medijos: Skaitmeninė prenumerata; Internetu; Spausdinta; Spausdinta ir internetu; Kita
ja: メディアアクセス: デジタルサブスクリプション; オンライン; 印刷; 印刷・オンライン; その他
es: Acceso a multimedia: Suscripción digital; En línea; Impresión; Impresión y en línea; Otros
ru: Доступ к СМИ: Цифровая подписка; Онлайн; Печать; Печать и онлайн; Другое
ko: 매체 접근: 디지털 구독; 온라인; 인쇄; 인쇄 & 온라인; 기타
bg-BG: Достъп до медиите: Цифров абонамент; Онлайн; Отпечатване; Отпечатване и онлайн; Други
da: Medieadgang: Digitalt abonnement; Online; Print; Print og online; Andet
zh-TW: 媒體存取: 數位訂閱; 線上; 印刷; 印刷與線上; 其他